Illinois, session 104th, SB3881.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Reference to Act. This Act may be referred to as 5the Mental Health Parity for All Act. 6    Section 5. The Department of Human Services Act is amended 7by adding Section 1-105 as follows: 8    (20 ILCS 1305/1-105 new)9    Sec. 1-105. Mental health wellness hubs.10    (a) Subject to appropriations, the Department of Human 11Services shall establish and administer a program that 12provides grants to community-based organizations to develop 13and establish mental health wellness hubs in communities 14disproportionately impacted by the closure of mental health 15clinics, hospitals, and schools. The goal of the program is to 16provide immediate and accessible behavioral health services 17and supports to individuals experiencing a mental health 18crisis or stress prior to the need for psychiatric 19hospitalization. Grants shall be awarded to community-based 20organizations with a demonstrable history of providing 21behavioral health services and supports to persons 22experiencing mental health-related stress. The mental health   SB3881- 2 -LRB104 19067 KTG 32512 b1wellness hubs shall provide an array of services aimed at 2promoting emotional and psychological well-being, including, 3but not limited to:4        (1) Crisis prevention and intervention.5        (2) Psychiatric assessments and evaluations.6        (3) Medication monitoring.7        (4) Case management and support.8        (5) Individual and group therapy.9        (6) Peer and family support.10        (7) Referrals to community resources.11        (8) Nutrition education.12        (9) Art therapy and physical activities.13    Services shall be tailored to the community's needs and 14shall be available year-round on a walk-in basis or by 15appointment to community members regardless of age or 16insurance coverage.17    (b) The Department may adopt any rules necessary to 18implement the program.